Washington statutes.
RCW 26.38.100

Applicability.

This section, RCW 26.38.110, 26.38.120, and 26.38.130 do not apply to a transfer of custody of a child by a parent or guardian of the child to:

(1) A parent of the child;

(2) A stepparent of the child;

(3) An adult who is related to the child by blood or by law;

(4) An adult who, at the time of the transfer, had a close relationship with the child or the parent or guardian of the child for a substantial period, and whom the parent or guardian reasonably believes, at the time of the transfer, to be a fit custodian of the child;

(5) An Indian custodian, as defined in the Indian child welfare act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903, as amended, of the child;

(6) A member of the child's customary family unit recognized by the child's Indian tribe under chapter 13.38 RCW; or

(7) A delegation by a parent pursuant to RCW 11.130.145.

[ 2022 c 88 s 201.]